Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.93.050

Data collection.

(1) The office shall collect data on the program in collaboration with the institutions of higher education. The data must include, but is not limited to:

(a) The number of eligible students who were awarded a student loan;

(b) The number of borrowers;

(c) The average borrowed annual and total balances;

(d) Borrower demographics;

(e) The institutions of higher education and educational fields of borrowers;

(f) Postgraduation employment data;

(g) Time to degree completion; and

(h) Repayment statistics, including:

(i) The number of borrowers in active repayment, deferment, delinquency, forbearance, and default;

(ii) The average time it took for borrowers to enter delinquency and default;

(iii) Demographic and educational data of borrowers enrolled in the income-based repayment plan option;

(iv) Demographic and educational data of borrowers in different repayment statuses, including delinquency and default; and

(v) Information about what happened to borrowers who defaulted.

(2) Beginning December 1, 2027, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office must submit an annual report on the data collected under subsection (1) of this section and any other relevant information regarding the program to the higher education committees of the legislature.

[ 2023 c 389 s 6; 2022 c 206 s 6.]